Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.71, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Glazing material; exceptions. (a) Subdivision 4 does not apply to glazing materials that: (1) have not been modified since the original installation, nor to original replacement windows and windshields, that were originally installed or replaced in conformity with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 205; (2) are required to satisfy prescription or medical needs, provided: (i) the vehicle's driver or a passenger possesses a prescription or a physician's statement of medical need; (ii) new text begin the prescription specifically states whether the medical need is a temporary or permanent condition;new text end new text begin (iii) new text end the prescription or statement specifically states the minimum percentage that light transmittance may be reduced to satisfy the prescription or medical needs of the patient; and deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end the prescription or statement contains an expiration datenew text begin provided by the physiciannew text end , which must be no more than two years after the date the prescription or statement was issuednew text begin , unless an indication is made by the physician that the driver's condition is permanent and no expiration date is appropriatenew text end ; or (3) are applied to: (i) the rear windows of a pickup truck as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 26; (ii) the rear windows or the side windows on either side behind the driver's seat of a van as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 40; (iii) the side and rear windows of a vehicle used to transport human remains by a funeral establishment holding a license under section 149A.50; (iv) the side and rear windows of a limousine as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 15; or (v) the rear and side windows of a police vehicle. (b) For the purposes of paragraph (a), clause (2), a driver of a vehicle may rely on a prescription or physician's statement of medical need issued to a person not present in the vehicle if: (1) the prescription or physician's statement of medical need is issued to (i) the driver's parent, child, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or spouse, or (ii) a person for whom the driver is a personal care attendant; (2) the prescription or physician's statement of medical need specifies the make, model, and license plate of one or two vehicles that will have tinted windows; and (3) the driver is in possession of the prescription or physician's statement of medical need. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to prescriptions issued on or after that date. new text end